Oklahoma, session 2025, SB819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 318, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 318. A. 1. Any party aggrieved by a final agency


order in an individual proceeding is entitled to certain, speedy,


adequate and complete judicial review thereof pursuant to the


provisions of this section and Sections 319, 320, 321, 322 and 323


of this title.





Req. No. 791 Page 1


2. This section shall not prevent resort to other means of


review, redress, relief or trial de novo, available because of


constitutional provisions.


3. Neither a motion for new trial nor an application for


rehearing shall be prerequisite to secure judicial review.


4. A claim under the Administrative Procedures Act accrues when


any plaintiff properly joined in the action has the right to assert


the claim in court, which at the earliest shall be the date the


party is aggrieved by final agency action.


B. 1. The judicial review prescribed by this section for final


agency orders, as to agencies whose final agency orders are made


subject to review, under constitutional or statutory provisions, by


appellate proceedings in the Supreme Court of Oklahoma, shall be


afforded by such proceedings taken in accordance with the procedure


and under the conditions otherwise provided by law, but subject to


the applicable provisions of Sections 319 through 324 of this title,


and the rules of the Supreme Court.


2. In all other instances, proceedings for review shall be


instituted by filing a petition, in the district court of the county


in which the party seeking review resides or at the option of such


party where the property interest affected is situated, naming as


respondents only the agency, such other party or parties in the


administrative proceeding as may be named by the petitioner or as


otherwise may be allowed by law, within thirty (30) days after the

Req. No. 791 Page 2


appellant is notified of the final agency order as provided in


Section 312 of this title.


C. Copies of the petition shall be delivered in person or


mailed, postage prepaid, to the agency and all other parties of


record, and proof of such delivery or mailing shall be filed in the


court within ten (10) days after the filing of the petition. Any


party not named as a respondent in the petition is entitled to


respond within ten (10) days of receipt of service. The court, in


its discretion, may permit other interested persons to intervene.


D. In any proceedings for review brought by a party aggrieved


by a final agency order:


1. The agency whose final agency order was made subject to


review may be entitled to recover against such aggrieved party any


court costs, witness fees and reasonable attorney fees if the court


determines that the proceeding brought by the party is frivolous or


was brought to delay the effect of said final agency order.; and


2. The party aggrieved by the final agency order may be


entitled to recover against such agency any court costs, witness


fees, and reasonable attorney fees if the court determines that the


proceeding brought by the agency is frivolous.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.1 of Title 75, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 791 Page 3


In the interpretation of a state statute, administrative rule,


or other subregulatory document, a court of this state or an officer


hearing an administrative action shall not defer to the


interpretation of a state agency and shall interpret the meaning and


effect de novo. In an action brought by or against a state agency,


after applying all customary tools of interpretation, the court or


hearing officer shall exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a


reasonable interpretation which limits agency power and maximizes


individual liberty.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 321.1 of Title 75, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No civil penalty may be awarded in an action brought by or


on behalf of an administrative agency of this state against any


person or legal entity for conduct that would also be the subject of


a suit at common law in which the defendant would be entitled to


trial by jury before a court established under the Oklahoma


Constitution, except after a trial by jury before such court.


B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not


apply to a summary judgment rendered in compliance with Title 12 of


the Oklahoma Statutes and any precedents establishing the standards


for summary judgment. Such requirement shall not apply to a civil


case in a court proceeding in equity jurisdiction that, prior to the



Req. No. 791 Page 4


passage of this act, did not involve a right to a trial by jury


before a court established under the Oklahoma Constitution.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-791 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:03 AM







































Req. No. 791 Page 5